Maryland, session 2025, HB0595.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–703.1.
NOTWITHSTANDING AND IN ADDITION TO THE RENEWABLE ENERGY
PORTFOLIO STANDARD ESTABLISHED IN § 7–703 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH TARGETS FOR ACHIEVING INDEPENDENT
RENEWABLE ENERGY GENERATION IN THE STATE WITH A GOAL OF ACHIEVING:
(1) 50% OF ALL ELECTRICITY SOLD IN THE STATE COMING FROM
ELECTRICITY PRODUCED FROM RENEWABLE ENERGY RESOURCES LOCATED IN THE
STATE BY 2030;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0595*

HOUSE BILL 595
(2) 70% OF ALL ELECTRICITY SOLD IN THE STATE COMING FROM
ELECTRICITY PRODUCED FROM RENEWABLE ENERGY RESOURCES LOCATED IN THE
STATE BY 2035; AND
(3) 80% OF ALL ELECTRICITY SOLD IN THE STATE COMING FROM
ELECTRICITY PRODUCED FROM RENEWABLE ENERGY RESOURCES LOCATED IN THE
STATE BY 2040.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.